Wisconsin, session 2025, AB422.
do enact as follows:AB422,13Section 1. 939.74 (2) (ap) of the statutes is created to read:AB422,2,24939.74 (2) (ap) A prosecution under s. 940.11 (2) may be commenced within 1the applicable time under sub. (1) or within 6 years of the date the corpse was 2discovered or identified, whichever is later.AB422,23Section 2. Initial applicability.AB422,2,64(1) Notwithstanding s. 990.06, this act first applies to an act for which the 5time limitation under s. 939.74 (1) for prosecution has not expired as of the effective 6date of this subsection.AB422,2,77